Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.130

Group false arrest insurance for law enforcement personnel.

Any county may contract with an insurance company authorized to do business in this state to provide group false arrest insurance for its law enforcement personnel and pursuant thereto may use such portion of its revenues to pay the premiums therefor as the county may determine.

[ 1963 c 127 s 2.]